Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1064
Licensure; examinations; duties; examinees.

(1) The board shall approve and the department shall cause examinations to be administered as required for licensure under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act for the purpose of establishing the possession of minimum competency in the knowledge and skills required on the part of the applicant.

(2) No person shall be permitted to take an examination for licensure unless he or she has met all the requirements of subdivisions (1), (2), and (5) of section 38-1062 except for persons taking the examination under section 38-1067.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 50;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 23;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 27;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-389;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 326.